apertium-id-ms.id.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
<a badi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bai "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a baktinal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bdominal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bnormal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a brar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bras "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bsah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bsolut "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bsonan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bsorptif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bstain "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bstinensi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bstrak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bstraksi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bsurd "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a btar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bu "-" abu "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a buan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a buh "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bui "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a buk "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a buk "-" abuk "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bul "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bulhayat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bun "-" abun "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bur "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a bus "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a byad "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a cak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a cak "-" acakan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a cap "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ci "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a co "-" acoan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a cuh "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a d "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a daktil "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a daptabel "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a daptif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dati "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dekuat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dem "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dhesif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a diabatis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a diaktinik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dib "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dika "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dikara "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a disional "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ditif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a doptif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a drenergik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a duhai "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a duk "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dun "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dventisius "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a dverbial "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a erobik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a fdal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a fektif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a fiat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a firmatif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a fotik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ga "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a gamais "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a gamawi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a gentif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a gitatif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a glutinatif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a gogo "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a graris "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a gresif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a gul "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a gung "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a historis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hli "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hlulbait "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hlulkitab "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hlulkubur "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hlunujum "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hlusuluk "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hlusunah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hmak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hmar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ho "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hsan "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a hwal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a i "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ib "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a jab "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a jaib "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a jun "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kademik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kademis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kas "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a katalepsia "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kbar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a khlaki "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kil "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kli "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kliah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kmal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a komodatif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kor "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a krab "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ksa "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kseptabel "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ksiomatis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ktif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ktinik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ktual "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kuatik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kumulatif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kur "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kurat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a kustik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a laihisalam "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lami "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lamiah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lap "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lbinoid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lbuminoit "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a legoris "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a legro "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a liah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a li "-" ali "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a liansi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a likuot "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lim "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a limbubu "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a limentasi "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a limenter "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a limiah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a limiat "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a limun "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lin "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a linea "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ling "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lip "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lir "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lisiklik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lit "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lkalis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lot "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lpa "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ltruistis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lum "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a luvial "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a lveolar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a m "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a maliah "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a man "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mbek "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mbigu "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mbisius "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mbivalen "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mbulakral "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mbulatori "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a meboid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a melioratif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a menta "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a moral "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a morf "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mpai "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mpang "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a mpuh "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a naerobik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a naforis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nakronistis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nalitis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nalog "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nani "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a narkistis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nasional "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a natomis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ncai "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ncak "-" ancak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ndal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ndam "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a neh "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a neka "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a neroid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nggara "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nggun "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ngit "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ngker "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ngkuh "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ngler "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ngot "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ngus "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nisotropis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nom "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nonim "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a norganik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a norgastik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nta "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntagonistis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntap "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntara "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nteng "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntep "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nter "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nterior "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nti "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntihistamin "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntiklinal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntiseptik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntisipatif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntitank "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntropoid "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntroposentris "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntun "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a ntusias "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nual "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a numerta "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nyar "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nyel "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nyep "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nyes "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a nyir "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a pak "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a pas "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a patis "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a patride "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a pes "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a pik "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a pikal "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
<a plikatif "@P.POS.adj@">        InflectionOption ;
